Washington statutes.
RCW 41.32.4991

Permanent retirement allowance adjustment.

The dollar amount of the temporary postretirement allowance adjustment granted by section 1, chapter 519, Laws of 1993 shall be provided as a permanent retirement allowance adjustment as of July 1, 1995.

[ 1994 c 247 s 1.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1994 c 247: "This act shall take effect August 1, 1994." [ 1994 c 247 s 8.]

Temporary postretirement allowance—1993 c 519: "The benefit adjustment granted by sections 711(1) and 712(1), chapter 232, Laws of 1992 (uncodified) being received by plan 1 beneficiaries as of June 30, 1993, unless otherwise improper, shall be continued through June 30, 1995." [ 1993 c 519 s 1.]